Missouri, session 2026, HB2556.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 334, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 334.071, to read as follows:
334.071. 1. At a health care facility, as the term "facility" is defined in section
354.600, or in a telehealth setting as described in section 191.1145, only physicians
licensed under this chapter shall use the following medical titles or specialty
designations:
(1) "Physician", except that individuals licensed under chapter 331 may use the
term "chiropractic physician", individuals licensed under section 334.036 may use the
term "assistant physician", and individuals licensed under sections 334.735 to 334.749
may use the term "physician assistant";
(2) "Doctor of medicine";
(3) "Medical doctor";
(4) "MD";
(5) "Doctor of osteopathic medicine";
(6) "Doctor of osteopathy";
(7) "DO";
(8) "Osteopath";
(9) "Osteopathic physician";
(10) "Osteopathic surgeon";
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2556 2
(11) "Surgeon";
(12) "Allergist";
(13) "Anesthesiologist";
(14) "Cardiologist";
(15) "Dermatologist";
(16) "Endocrinologist";
(17) "Emergency physician";
(18) "Family practice physician";
(19) "Gastroenterologist";
(20) "Gynecologist";
(21) "Hematologist";
(22) "Internist";
(23) "Laryngologist";
(24) "Nephrologist";
(25) "Neurologist";
(26) "Neurosurgeon";
(27) "Obstetrician";
(28) "Oncologist";
(29) "Ophthalmologist";
(30) "Orthopedic surgeon";
(31) "Orthopedist";
(32) "Otologist";
(33) "Otolaryngologist";
(34) "Otorhinolaryngologist";
(35) "Pathologist", except that individuals licensed under section 345.020 in
speech-language pathology may use the term "speech-language pathologist" or "speech
pathologist" in accordance with section 345.020;
(36) "Pediatrician";
(37) "Physiatrist";
(38) "Primary care physician";
(39) "Proctologist";
(40) "Psychiatrist";
(41) "Radiologist";
(42) "Rheumatologist";
(43) "Rhinologist"; and
(44) "Urologist".

HB 2556 3
2. In addition to any other remedy provided by state law, any patient who
receives health care services from a nonphysician health care provider who uses a
medical title or specialty designation reserved for physicians in violation of this section
shall have a private cause of action against the nonphysician health care provider. The
patient may seek:
(1) Actual damages sustained as a result of the violation;
(2) Injunctive relief to prevent future violations;
(3) Punitive damages if the violation was willful and reckless; and
(4) Reasonable attorney's fees and court costs.
3. Any individual licensed by a board within the division of professional
registration of the department of commerce and insurance who violates this section may
be subject to discipline by the relevant licensing board.
✔